Georgia statutes. TITLE 30 Handicapped Persons
Cross references.

Continuation of trusts for benefit of schools for the blind and the deaf, §

20-2-18

.

Special education services for children with physical, mental, or emotional disabilities, §

20-2-152

.

Use of school buses to provide transportation for persons with disabilities, §

20-2-1074

.

Aid to disabled or illiterate in voter registration process, §

21-2-220

.

Lending of voting assistance to the physically disabled, §

21-2-409

.

Treatment and rehabilitation of spinal cord disabled persons, § 31-18-1 et seq.

Discrimination against persons with disabilities in employment, §

34-6A-1

et seq.

Special license plates for disabled veterans, §

40-2-68

et seq.

Special license plates for disabled persons generally, §

40-2-74

.

Community service by certain offenders as live-in attendants for disabled persons, § 42-8-72.

Regulation of business of hearing aid dealers and dispensers, §

43-20-1

et seq.

Licensing of occupational therapists, §

43-28-1

et seq.